apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzščćÅåøØðÐÞþÆæ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"       c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="predet"    c="Pre determiner"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"     c="Neuter determiner"/>
    <sdef n="top"       c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"      c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="ant"       c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="al"        c="Altres"/>
    <sdef n="cog"       c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="org"       c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="atn"       c="Atónico"/>
    <sdef n="enc"       c="Enclitic"/>
    <sdef n="pro"       c="Proclitic"/>
    <sdef n="tn"        c="Tónico"/>
    <sdef n="n"         c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"        c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adj"       c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="f"         c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"         c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"        c="Masculine or feminine"/>
    <sdef n="sg"        c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"        c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="adv"       c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"    c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="pr"        c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"       c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="rel"       c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="nn"        c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="an"        c="Animate or inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="aa"        c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="ind"       c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="itg"       c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="det"       c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"       c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="def"       c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"    c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"    c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"    c="Conjunctive adverb"/>
    <sdef n="nt"        c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"     c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"   c="Verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"     c="Standard ('lexical') verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"     c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="inf"       c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="ger"       c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="pp"        c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="p1"        c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"        c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"        c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="pii"       c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"       c="Past definite"/>
    <sdef n="fti"       c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="cni"       c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="prs"       c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pis"       c="Imperfect subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="fts"       c="Future subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="imp"       c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pos"       c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="sp"        c="Singular or plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref"       c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="sup"       c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="ord"       c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"       c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="num"       c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="ij"        c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="sent"      c="Sentence-ending punctuation"/>
    <sdef n="quot"      c="Quotation"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"     c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"     c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="cm"        c="Comma punctuation"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"      c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"      c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"    c="Left question/exclamation mark"/>
    <sdef n="web"       c="Links and Emails"/>
    <sdef n="apos"      c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="percent"   c="Percentage"/>
    <sdef n="guio"      c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="past"      c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="sep"       c="Separable verb"/>
    <sdef n="sint"      c="Synthetic"/>
    <sdef n="email"     c="Electronic Mail"/>
    <sdef n="obj"       c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="subj"      c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="subs"      c="Verbal Noun or Verbal Substantive"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"      c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="gen"       c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"      c="Verb 'to do'"/>
    <sdef n="comp"      c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="pres"      c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"      c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="sym"       c="Symbol"/>
    <sdef n="ND"        c="Number to be determined"/>
    <sdef n="GD"        c="Gender to be determined"/>

    <sdef n="probj"/>
    <sdef n="plc"/>
    <sdef n="inst"/>
    <sdef n="time"      c="Time"/>
    <sdef n="prperf"    c="Present Perfect"/>
    <sdef n="prcont"    c="Present Continuous"/>
    <sdef n="presneg"   c="Present Negative"/>
    <sdef n="p4"/>
    <sdef n="conj"      c="Conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="punct"     c="punctuation"/>
    <sdef n="stop"/>

    <sdef n="sfx"/>

    <!-- Visit: http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols for more symbols -->
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>    
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>      <p>        <l>-</l>        <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>      <p>        <l>,</l>        <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="aposchar">
      <e>        <i>'</i>    </e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>’</l>        <r>'</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>        <par n="aposchar"/>       <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros_romanos">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="months">
      <e><p><l>January</l><r>January</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>February</l><r>February</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>March</l><r>March</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>April</l><r>April</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>May</l><r>May</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>June</l><r>June</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>July</l><r>July</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>August</l><r>August</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>September</l><r>September</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>October</l><r>October</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>November</l><r>November</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>December</l><r>December</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="dates">
      <e>      <re>[2-3]?[0,4-9]</re><p><l>th<b/></l><r>th<b/></r></p><par n="months"/><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <re>1[0-9]</re><p><l>th<b/></l><r>th<b/></r></p><par n="months"/><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <re>[2-9]*</re><p><l>1st<b/></l><r>1st<b/></r></p><par n="months"/><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <re>[2-9]*</re><p><l>2nd<b/></l><r>2nd<b/></r></p><par n="months"/><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <re>[2-9]*</re><p><l>3rd<b/></l><r>3rd<b/></r></p><par n="months"/><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
    <e><par n="dates"/></e>
